Massachusetts, session 194th, S1165.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 63 of chapter 277 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting at the end
thereof the following new paragraph:-
Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an indictment or complaint alleging
an offense of indecent assault and battery, or an offense of rape, may be found and filed at any
time after the commission of such offense, provided that the victim was under the age of 18
when the offense was committed.
of 1